Washington statutes.
RCW 41.76.070

Certain contracts or agreements—Chapter 34.05 RCW does not apply.

Contracts or agreements, or any provision thereof, entered into between boards of regents or trustees and exclusive bargaining representatives pursuant to this chapter are not affected by or subject to chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 2002 c 356 s 17.]